Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.200

Personal liability on unlawful loans.

Every director, officer, agent, or employee of an association who shall borrow or who shall knowingly permit any person to borrow any of its funds in violation of the provisions of this title shall be personally liable for any loss or damage which the association may sustain in consequence thereof.

[ 1945 c 235 s 94; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-213.]